West Virginia, session 2025, HB2938.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STANDARDS AND SCHEDULES. 60A-2-204a. Sale or dispensing of ivermectin. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, ivermectin may be sold, dispensed by a pharmacist or pharmacy over the counter, or possessed without a prescription.